Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4505
Applicant, defined.

Applicant shall mean (1) in the case of an individual policy, the person who seeks to contract for such benefits and (2) in the case of a group policy, the proposed certificate holder.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 5.